North Carolina, session 2025, HB908.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 122C-268(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) If the respondent's custody order indicates that he the respondent was charged with a
violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and that he the
respondent was found incapable of proceeding, the clerk shall give notice of the time and place
of the hearing to the chief district judge and the district attorney in the county in which the
defendant was found incapable of proceeding as provided in G.S. 122C-264(d). The district
attorney in the county in which the respondent was found incapable of proceeding may represent
the State's interest at the hearing. If the district attorney elects to represent the State's interest,
upon motion of the district attorney, the venue for the hearing, rehearings, and supplemental
rehearings shall be the county in which the respondent was found incapable of proceeding."
SECTION 2. G.S. 122C-277(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) If the respondent was initially committed as the result of conduct resulting in his the
respondent being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a
deadly weapon, and respondent was found incapable of proceeding, 15 days before the
respondent's discharge or conditional release the attending physician shall notify facility shall
notify the district attorney of the district where the respondent was found incapable of proceeding
and the clerk of superior court of the county in which the facility is located of his or her
determination regarding the proposed discharge or conditional release. The clerk shall then
schedule a rehearing to determine the appropriateness of respondent's release under the standards
of commitment set forth in G.S. 122C-271(b). The clerk shall give notice as provided in
G.S. 122C-264(d). The district attorney of the district where respondent was found incapable of
proceeding may represent the State's interest at the hearing. If the district attorney elects to
represent the State's interest, upon motion of the district attorney, the venue for the hearing,
rehearings, and supplemental rehearings shall be the county in which the respondent was found
incapable of proceeding."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to commitment
hearings initiated on or after that date.
*H908-v-2*